Louisiana, session 2026, SB14.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:710.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§710.3. Reemployment of retired teachers and related provisions
A.(1) Any retiree who retired on or before June 30, 2010, and who
returns to active service with an employer covered by the provisions of this
Chapter, may receive a benefit during the period of his reemployment.
(2) Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, any retiree who
is sixty-five years of age or older may receive a benefit during the period of his
reemployment. The provisions of this Paragraph shall apply beginning on the
first day of the month in which the retiree attains the age of sixty-five.
(3) The provisions of Subsections C and D of this Section shall not apply
to any retiree covered under this Subsection, provided however, that a retiree
to whom Paragraph (2) of this Subsection applies may elect to be governed by
the provisions of Paragraph (C)(3) of this Section. Any election to be covered by
the provisions of Paragraph (C)(3) of this Section shall be made in writing and
filed with the appropriate officer of the employer.
(4)(a) During the period of his return to active service, the retiree and his
employer shall make contributions to the retirement system as otherwise
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
provided by law, but the retiree shall receive no additional service credits or
accrue any additional retirement benefits in the retirement system. Upon
termination of active service, the retiree shall, upon application, be refunded the
employee contributions paid since reemployment. The refund shall be without
interest. The retirement system shall retain the employer contributions.
(b) The provisions of this Paragraph shall not be applicable to any
retiree who elects to be governed by the provisions of Paragraph (C)(3) of this
Section.
B.(1) Any retiree who resumes active service under the provisions of this
Chapter within twelve months immediately following the effective date of his
retirement shall have his retirement benefits suspended. This suspension shall
remain in effect for the duration of the active service or until twelve months
have elapsed from the effective date of his retirement, whichever occurs first.
(2) No person who retires based on a disability shall be permitted to
return to active service pursuant to the provisions of this Section. Disability
retirees shall instead be covered by the provisions of law specifically applicable
to disability retirees.
C.(1) Except as provided in Subsections B and D of this Section, any
retiree who returns to active service with an employer covered by the provisions
of this Chapter shall, for that period of employment, be reemployed pursuant
to the provisions of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, unless the retiree elects to
be covered by the provisions of Paragraph (3) of this Subsection. Any election
to be covered by the provisions of Paragraph (3) of this Subsection shall be
made in writing and filed with the appropriate officer of the employer.
(2)(a) Earnings limit. A retiree may be employed in any position covered
by this system during any fiscal year, provided that his earnings in such
employment do not exceed fifty percent of his original final average
compensation during that fiscal year. If the actual earnings of the retiree exceed
this amount in any fiscal year, the benefits payable to the retiree shall be
reduced by the amount in excess of fifty percent of his original final average
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
compensation.
(b) During the period of his return to active service, the retiree and his
employer shall make contributions to the retirement system as otherwise
required by law, but the retiree shall receive no additional service credits or
accrue any additional retirement benefits in the retirement system. Upon
termination of active service, the retiree shall, upon application, be refunded the
employee contributions paid since reemployment. The refund shall be without
interest. The retirement system shall retain the employer contributions.
(3)(a) Supplemental benefit. Any retiree directly employed in a full-time
position covered by this system may request the immediate suspension of his
benefit, which may include all Deferred Retirement Option Plan and Initial
Lump-Sum Benefit distributions, and regain membership in the system effective
on the first day of reemployment. Upon such regaining of membership, the
retiree and his employer shall make contributions to the retirement system as
otherwise provided by law. Upon termination, the suspended retirement
allowance of the retiree shall be fully restored, effective the day after the
member terminates from service.
(b) The retiree shall be eligible for a supplemental benefit under this
option using the same computation formula applied to the retiree's original
retirement. If the retiree has been reemployed and contributed for less than
thirty-six months, the supplemental benefit shall be calculated using the
retiree's original final average compensation. If the retiree has been reemployed
and contributed for at least thirty-six months, the final average compensation
used to calculate the supplemental benefit shall be the greater of the retiree's
original final average compensation or his final average compensation since
reemployment.
(i) In no event shall the member receive duplicate credit for unused sick
and annual leave that was included in the computation of his original retirement
allowance.
(ii) The supplemental benefit shall be based on reemployment service
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
credit only and shall not include any other specific amounts which may
otherwise be provided in the regular retirement benefit computation formula,
including sick and annual leave.
(c) A retiree shall not be eligible for subsequent retirement until ninety
days after resignation or termination from all employment covered by the
provisions of this Paragraph, as certified by the employer. The supplemental
benefit shall become payable effective as of the later of:
(i) The date a properly executed application for subsequent retirement
is received by the board of trustees of this system.
(ii) Ninety days after resignation or termination, as certified by the
employer.
(d) Any application for subsequent retirement shall become void if the
retiree returns to active service covered by the provisions of this Paragraph
within ninety days of resignation or termination and elects to be covered by the
provisions of this Paragraph for the period of such employment.
(e) In the event of the death of a member prior to subsequent retirement,
benefits shall be paid to the designated beneficiary or survivor in accordance
with the option selected by the member at the time of his original retirement,
as provided in R.S. 11:783(A)(2) and R.S. 11:762(C) and (I). No changes to the
originally selected option shall be permitted.
(f) In no event shall the supplemental benefit, when combined with the
original benefit, exceed an amount which equals one hundred percent of the
greater of the retiree's original final average compensation or the average
compensation figure used to calculate the supplemental benefit.
(g) Under no circumstances shall a retiree who has regained membership
pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph be allowed to purchase service
credit for any period employed in public service during which the retiree
continued to draw a retirement allowance.
(h) A retiree who elects to be covered by the provisions of this Paragraph
for any period of employment shall also be subject to the provisions of this
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
Paragraph for any other concurrent employment covered by the provisions of
this Chapter.
(4) For purposes of this Subsection, the following terms have the
meanings ascribed to them:
(a) "Original benefit" means the benefit calculated at the time of the
retiree's original retirement, including any post-Deferred Retirement Option
Plan supplement.
(b) "Original final average compensation" means the final average
compensation calculated at the time of the retiree's original retirement. If the
retiree participated in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan, the retiree's
original final average compensation shall be the greater of the average
compensation used to calculate the retiree's monthly credit or the average
compensation used to calculate any post-Deferred Retirement Option Plan
supplement.
D.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection C of this Section, a
retiree employed in a critical shortage position shall be governed by the
provisions of this Subsection, unless the retiree has elected to be covered by the
provisions of Paragraph (C)(3) of this Section.
(2)(a) Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, a retiree
certified in any area who is employed in a critical shortage position may receive
a benefit during the period of his reemployment if the employer has certified to
the board of trustees of this system that a critical shortage exists.
(b) Prior to certifying a critical shortage for any critical shortage
position, the employer shall:
(i) For any position sought to be filled by employment of a retiree, the
employer may certify the existence of a critical shortage only if the employer
continuously advertises on the website of the employer's governing authority
and, if applicable, on the employer's own website, that the employer is soliciting
applications for future employment of certified teachers.
(ii) Ensure that if a certified applicant who is not a retiree applies for an
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
advertised position, such applicant shall be hired before any certified retiree is
employed, unless fewer than three nonretiree applicants have applied for the
position, each of whom is certified in the critical shortage area being filled.
(3) At the time of enrollment in the system, the employer for a retiree
returning to active service in a position defined in Paragraph (4) of this
Subsection shall certify to the system that a critical shortage exists for the
position in the school district. Enrollments for retirees who are employed
pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection shall terminate at the end of each
fiscal year.
(4) "Critical shortage position" means any of the following:
(a)(i) A position for a full-time, part-time or temporary classroom
teacher who teaches any student in prekindergarten through twelfth grade or
instructs adults through an adult education or literacy program administered
through a public institution of elementary or secondary education in a school
where a critical shortage exists.
(ii) For purposes of this Subparagraph, "classroom teacher" shall mean
any employee whose position of employment requires a valid Louisiana teaching
certification and who is assigned professional activities of instructing pupils in
courses in traditional or nontraditional classroom settings where daily pupil
attendance figures for the school system are kept or is assigned to proctor
admissions, evaluation, or assessment testing.
(b) A position for a full-time, part-time or temporary certified speech
therapist, speech pathologist, audiologist, educational diagnostician, school
social worker, school counselor, school psychologist, interpreter, educational
transliterator, orientation or mobility specialist, educator of the visually
impaired, or educator of the deaf or hard of hearing, provided the position of
employment requires a valid Louisiana ancillary certificate approved and
issued by the state Department of Education in a school district where a critical
shortage exists.
(5) During the period of his return to active service under the provisions
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
of this Subsection, the retiree and his employer shall make contributions to the
retirement system as required by this Chapter, but the retiree shall receive no
additional service credits or accrue any additional retirement benefits in the
retirement system. Upon termination of active service, the retired teacher shall,
upon application, be refunded the employee contributions paid since
reemployment. The refund shall be without interest. The retirement system
shall retain the employer contributions.
E. The provisions of this Section, other than Paragraph (C)(3) and
Subsection G of this Section, shall be applicable to any retiree who returns to
active service with an employer covered by the provisions of this Chapter whose
reemployment is based on a contract or corporate contract under the following
circumstances:
(1) For nonpostsecondary employers, when the services provided could
be performed by an employee of a public school district and the services
provided fall under the following areas:
(a) Instructional programs, including regular and special education
instruction across all age and grade levels, and vocational and other
instructional programs.
(b) Pupil support services, including child welfare and attendance
services, guidance services, health services, and pupil assessment and appraisal
services.
(c) Instructional staff services, including curriculum development
services, parish-wide directors, supervisors and coordinators of instructional
programs, media-based instructional staff, educational media or instructional
staff, and clerical and support staff that support instructional staff services
positions. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not include staff training
services.
(d) School administration, including principals, assistant principals and
related administrator positions at school sites, and clerical and support staff
that support school administration positions.
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
(e) Food services operations, including school food service supervisors
and assistant supervisors, cafeteria managers and assistant managers, lunch
room workers, aides, food services personnel, and clerical and support staff that
support food services positions.
(2) For public postsecondary education institutions, when the retiree is
reemployed as a professor, adjunct professor, instructor, or researcher.
F.(1) When a retiree covered by this Section returns to active service
with an employer covered by the provisions of this Chapter, either through
direct employment, contract, or corporate contract, the employing agency shall,
within thirty days thereafter, notify the board of trustees of such employment
and the date on which employment commenced. Upon termination of the
retiree's employment, the agency shall provide the same notice.
(2) In addition, the employing agency shall also report to the retirement
system within forty-five days after June thirtieth of each year, the names of all
persons being paid by the employing agency and all persons having received a
benefit, whether by contract or corporate contract, pursuant to the provisions
of this Section, along with such individuals' social security numbers, their
positions, their designations as part-time or full-time, and the amount of their
earnings during the previous fiscal year ending on June thirtieth of the
reporting year. The employing agency shall also transmit a monthly
contributions report pursuant to R.S. 11:888(A). Such monthly reports shall be
transmitted within thirty days of the last day of each month and shall include
the salary paid to each individual retiree to whom this Section applies. Should
failure to give notice of return to active service or failure to report any other
information required by this Section result in any payment being made in
violation of this Section, the employing agency shall be liable to the system for
the repayment of such amounts.
(3) Should any employer covered by the system employ a retiree subject
to this provision and fail to submit the report required by this Subsection, the
retiree shall be considered as returning to active service under the provisions
Page 8 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 14 ENROLLED
of Paragraph (C)(2) of this Section.
G.(1) The salary of a retiree who is reemployed pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall be based on the salary schedule which accounts
for all prior years of teaching service and pertinent experience.
(2) The status of any retiree who is reemployed pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall be the same as a full-time active employee and
shall be subject to all applicable rules, procedures, policies, and statutes
governing full-time active employees.
H. The system and the legislative auditor shall determine any identifiable
actuarial impact of this Section following the experience study of the system for
the period ending June 30, 2032, and shall report their findings to the chairmen
of the House Committee on Retirement and the Senate Committee on
Retirement not less than one hundred twenty days before the commencement
of the 2034 Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature for consideration of
legislative action, as necessary.
Section 2. R.S. 11:710, 710.1, and 710.2 are hereby repealed.
Section 3. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.